Utah statutes.
67-19-14.1.   Converted sick leave.
(1)  Until January 1, 2014, an employee who has 144 hours of accumulated
unused sick leave immediately prior to the beginning of a calendar year, may
elect to convert any unused sick leave hours accumulated during that calendar
year, in excess of 64 hours, to converted sick leave.
(2)  The conversion is made at the beginning of the next calendar year for
unused sick leave hours earned during a calendar year under Subsection (1).
(3)  Converted sick leave hours:
(a)  are not subject to the reduction provided under Subsection
67-19-14.2(4)(a)(ii);
(b)  that are not used prior to an employee's retirement date shall be used
under the:
(i)  Unused Sick Leave Retirement Option Program I under Section 67-19-14.2 if
earned prior to January 1, 2006, unless the transfer is made under Subsection
67-19-14.4(1)(c); or
(ii)  Unused Sick Leave Retirement Option Program II under Section 67-19-14.4
if earned on or after January 1, 2006.
